Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.99.030

Medical student loan account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

(1) The medical student loan account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the executive director of the office or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the account for medical student loans. An appropriation is required for expenditures from the account for costs associated with program administration by the office.

(2) The office shall deposit into the account all moneys received for the program. Revenues to the account consist of moneys received for the program by the office, including grants and donations, and receipts from participant repayments, including principal and interest.

(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for medical student loans to participants in the program established by this chapter and costs associated with program administration by the office.

[ 2018 c 209 s 3.]